Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 72
REGISTRATION OF FARM NAMES

7-72-101 and 7-72-102. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article repealed, p. 194, § 5, effective April 13.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 4 of chapter 141, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1995, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.